Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1298YH (6) 91 as/js H.F. 463 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 13.36 Human trafficking prosecution 1 units. 2 1. Two human trafficking prosecution units are established 3 in the department of justice. The attorney general, in 4 cooperation and coordination with the department of public 5 safety, the office to combat human trafficking established 6 within the department of public safety under section 80.45, and 7 the department of health and human services, shall develop, 8 staff, and equip two multidisciplinary teams to identify, 9 investigate, and prosecute human trafficking cases and provide 10 care and support for the victims of human trafficking. 11 2. One human trafficking prosecution unit shall serve the 12 western half of the state, and the other human trafficking 13 prosecution unit shall serve the eastern half of the state, 14 with interstate 35 serving as the bisecting line. 15 3. A human trafficking prosecution unit shall include but 16 not be limited to: 17 a. The attorney general, or the attorney generalâs designee. 18 b. Criminal investigators from the department of public 19 safety. 20 c. State and local law enforcement representatives. 21 d. Victim services representatives. 22 e. Health care representatives. 23 f. Community organization representatives. 24 g. Survivor advocacy group representatives. 25 4. In addition to the duties set forth in subsection 26 1, a human trafficking prosecution unit may also conduct 27 training and provide technical assistance to increase community 28 awareness. 29 5. For purposes of this section, âhuman traffickingâ means 30 the same as defined in section 710A.1. 31